Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2218
Regulating board; certificate of registration; revoke or suspend; procedure.

The regulating board may, upon a form prescribed by it, suspend or revoke any certificate of registration of any professional corporation, upon the revocation or suspension of the license to render professional service of any officer, director, shareholder, or professional employee of a holder of a certificate of registration. Notice of such revocation shall be provided the professional corporation affected by sending by certified or registered United States mail a certified copy of such revocation to the professional corporation at its principal place of business set forth in the registration certificate so revoked. At the same time, the regulating board shall forward by regular United States mail a certified copy of such revocation to the Secretary of State who shall thereupon remove the revoked registration certificate from his file and deliver the same to such regulating board.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 18, p. 561.